Yamls/Pron-mukod_gt-norm.yaml
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: мукӧддэзнам 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧтӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьям]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: мукӧддэзам
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [мукӧддэсим, мукӧддэзсим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: мукӧддэзам
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧлань, мукӧддэзланям]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧсянь, мукӧддэзсяням]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧттям, мукӧддэзӧттим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧдззам, мукӧддэзӧдззим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзланям, мукӧддэзӧланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзланьсим, мукӧддэзӧланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзланям, мукӧддэзӧланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсяням]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттям, мукӧддэзланьӧттим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [мукӧддэзӧланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззам, мукӧддэзланьӧдззим]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: мукӧддэзӧланьви 


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [мукӧддэт, мукӧддэзыт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтӧ, мукӧддэзтӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтлӧн, мукӧддэзытлӧн]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтлісь, мукӧддэзытлісь]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтлӧ, мукӧддэзытлӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: мукӧддэзнат 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [мукӧддэткӧт, мукӧддэзыткӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [мукӧддэттӧг, мукӧддэзыттӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтла, мукӧддэзытла]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтся, мукӧддэзытся]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: мукӧддэзат
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [мукӧддэсит, мукӧддэзсит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: мукӧддэзат
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтлань, мукӧддэзытлань, мукӧддэзланят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтсянь, мукӧддэзытсянь, мукӧддэзсянят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [мукӧддэзӧттят, мукӧддэзӧттит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [мукӧддэзӧдззат, мукӧддэзӧдззит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтви, мукӧддэзытви]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: [мукӧддэзланят, мукӧддэтланьын, мукӧддэзытланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg2: [мукӧддэзланьсит, мукӧддэтланись, мукӧддэзытланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: [мукӧддэзланят, мукӧддэтланьӧ, мукӧддэзытланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтланьсянь, мукӧддэзытланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсянят]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтланьӧт, мукӧддэзытланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттят, мукӧддэзланьӧттит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтланьӧдз, мукӧддэзытланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззат, мукӧддэзланьӧдззит]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [мукӧддэтланьви, мукӧддэзытланьви] 


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [мукӧддэс, мукӧддэзыс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсӧ, мукӧддэзсӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [мукӧддэслӧн, мукӧддэзыслӧн]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [мукӧддэслісь, мукӧддэзыслісь]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [мукӧддэслӧ, мукӧддэзыслӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: мукӧддэзнас 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [мукӧддэскӧт, мукӧддэзыскӧт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [мукӧддэстӧг, мукӧддэзыстӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьяс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсла, мукӧддэзысла]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсся, мукӧддэзысся]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: мукӧддэзас
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсис, мукӧддэзсис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: мукӧддэзас
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [мукӧддэслань, мукӧддэзыслань, мукӧддэзланяс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [мукӧддэссянь, мукӧддэзыссянь, мукӧддэзсяняс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [мукӧддэзӧттяс, мукӧддэзӧттис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [мукӧддэзӧдззас, мукӧддэзӧдззис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсви, мукӧддэзысви]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: [мукӧддэзланяс, мукӧддэсланьын, мукӧддэзысланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxSg3: [мукӧддэзланьсис, мукӧддэсланись, мукӧддэзысланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: [мукӧддэзланяс, мукӧддэсланьӧ, мукӧддэзысланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсланьсянь, мукӧддэзысланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсяняс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсланьӧт, мукӧддэзысланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттяс, мукӧддэзланьӧттис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсланьӧдз, мукӧддэзысланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззас, мукӧддэзланьӧдззис]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: [мукӧддэсланьви, мукӧддэзысланьви]

 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: мукӧддэзным
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымӧс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнаным 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымкӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымтӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьяным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: мукӧддэзаным
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: [мукӧддэсиным, мукӧддэзсиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: мукӧддэзаным
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымлань, мукӧддэзланяным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымсянь, мукӧддэзсяняным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзӧттяным, мукӧддэзӧттиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзӧдззаным, мукӧддэзӧдззиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзланяным, мукӧддэзнымланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзланьсиным, мукӧддэзнымланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзланяным, мукӧддэзнымланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсяняным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттяным, мукӧддэзланьӧттиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl1: [мукӧддэзнымланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззаным, мукӧддэзланьӧдззиным]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl1: мукӧддэзнымланьви 


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: мукӧддэзныт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытлӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытлісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытлӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнаныт 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl2: мукӧддэзныткӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзныттӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьяныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: мукӧддэзаныт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: [мукӧддэсиныт, мукӧддэзсиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: мукӧддэзаныт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзнытлань, мукӧддэзланяныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзнытсянь, мукӧддэзсяняныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзӧттяныт, мукӧддэзӧттиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзӧдззаныт, мукӧддэзӧдззиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзланяныт, мукӧддэзнытланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзланьсиныт, мукӧддэзнытланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзланяныт, мукӧддэзнытланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзнытланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсяняныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзнытланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттяныт, мукӧддэзланьӧттиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl2: [мукӧддэзнытланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззаныт, мукӧддэзланьӧдззиныт]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl2: мукӧддэзнытланьви 


    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: мукӧддэзныс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнысӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: мукӧддэзныслӧн
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: мукӧддэзныслісь
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: мукӧддэзныслӧ
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнаныс 
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com+PxPl3: мукӧддэзныскӧт
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Car+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзныстӧг, мукӧддэзтӧгьяныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cns+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнысла
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Cmpr+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнысся
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: мукӧддэзаныс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: [мукӧддэсиныс, мукӧддэзсиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: мукӧддэзаныс
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзныслань, мукӧддэзланяныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзныссянь, мукӧддэзсяняныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзӧттяныс, мукӧддэзӧттиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerI+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзӧдззаныс, мукӧддэзӧдззиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+TerII+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнысви
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIne+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзланяныс, мукӧддэзнысланьын]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+ApIndefa+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзланьсиныс, мукӧддэзнысланись]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprIll+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзланяныс, мукӧддэзнысланьӧ]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprEgr+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзнысланьсянь, мукӧддэзланьсяняныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprPrl+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзнысланьӧт, мукӧддэзланьӧттяныс, мукӧддэзланьӧттиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerI+PxPl3: [мукӧддэзнысланьӧдз, мукӧддэзланьӧдззаныс, мукӧддэзланьӧдззиныс]
    мукӧд+Pron+Indef+Pl+AprTerII+PxPl3: мукӧддэзнысланьви 
